District of Columbia statutes.
19-1305.03

Exceptions to spendthrift provision.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “child” includes any person for whom an order or judgment for child support has been entered in this or another State.

(b)

Whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a beneficiary’s child, who has a judgment or court order against the beneficiary for support or maintenance, may obtain from a court an order attaching present or future distributions when payable under the terms of the trust to or for the benefit of the beneficiary.

(c)

A spendthrift provision is unenforceable against a claim of the District of Columbia or the United States to the extent a statute of the District of Columbia or federal law so provides.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 503 of the Uniform Trust Code.